ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Anśic/3
Anśin/1,30
Apulin/1,30
Balic/3
Balin/1,30
Baršćin/1,30
Bertn/36
Bórkhamorj/1,2
Bělin/37
Derdulin/1,30
Goliaś/1,2
Hajśin/1,30
Husok/19
Jezusźiśetc/1,2
Jiłow/37
Kr/1,11
Krajn/37
Krut/1,30
Kórdulin/1,30
Libeśinj/1,2
Lěw/1,30
Now/1,30
Połžyź/1,10
Pudrin/1,30
Skibj/1,2
Sprugow/37
Wiłow/37
Wjelc/36
Wusok/19
Wóškow/37
apartheiś/1,2
barw/28
bloc/3
buź/33
ból/27
carob/28
carś/1,10
casnikaŕstwj/1,2
ceniś/3
chromjeś/3
chudob/28
chyl/23
daj/24
daź/3
dopjakl/1,4
dopłaś/14
dopśišł/1,17
dostan/1,7
dotěrował/16
dowiź/21
drastw/28
dubjańc/1,2
dup/28
dwójc/3
dłym/5
eurochequ/1,9
gl/1,11
gotic/1,2
gramnjen/1,18
gub/28
hennakr/1,11
insceněrowal/1,4
jutšn/1,29
jědl/1,10
kabelbomj/1,2
kapal/1,10
karaś/3
kip/28
kl/3
klapował/16
knechś/1,10
kokakr/1,11
kopśiw/28
kr/1,11
kreslaŕstwj/1,2
krjakaj/1,7
kup/38
kwit/8
kś/1,11
kšom/28
kšw/1,13
larb/28
m/12
manšeś/1,2
maś/3
minuś/3
mjatl/1,10
mjerw/28
ml/12
mnj/1,6
myrknul/1,4
móraw/28
měl/1,10
nadejšł/1,17
nadjěź/35
najšł/1,17
nakšadnuł/16
namjatnjen/1,18
nanjas/34
napódejšł/1,17
narost/8
nasmjerź/26
nawjed/1,7
nałp/28
njamašc/1,2
njeadsorběrowal/1,4
njebuź/33
njecasnikarił/16
njedaj/24
njedokłaź/35
njedolěz/34
njedopijaj/1,7
njedopśišł/1,17
njedorost/8
njedowaźil/1,4
njedowiź/21
njedozmógnjen/1,18
njefantazěrował/16
njej/1,6
njeklaskal/1,4
njeklatśaj/1,7
njekłopotał/16
njekś/1,11
njenadejšł/1,17
njenakwiś/35
njenakśikal/1,4
njenanjas/34
njenapadnjen/1,18
njenapomagaj/1,7
njenapódejšł/1,17
njenarost/8
njenasmjerź/26
njenasłuchał/16
njepregowal/1,4
njepyšpjeraj/1,7
njepóderb/20
njepódkłaź/35
njepódlěz/34
njepódpušćował/16
njepódrost/8
njepójšł/1,17
njepónjas/34
njepónuzlen/1,18
njepórost/8
njepótrjef/20
njepózjawjaj/1,7
njepśejšł/1,17
njepśekwiś/35
njepśelěz/34
njepśeměstnil/1,4
njepśerost/8
njepśesolen/1,18
njepśeswójł/16
njepśewiź/21
njepśewoblekaj/1,7
njepśilěz/34
njepśimjet/8
njepśipjac/35
njepśirost/8
njepśitrjef/20
njepśišł/1,17
njepšašaj/1,7
njerost/8
njerozměrnjen/1,18
njeroznjas/34
njerozpisowal/1,4
njerozrost/8
njerozsec/35
njerožkował/16
njerub/20
njeschylaj/1,7
njespójšł/1,17
njetaj/24
njetrjef/20
njetśirkaj/1,7
njewij/24
njewjelžnjen/1,18
njewobmam/20
njewobmyslil/1,4
njewobnjas/34
njewobpśěź/35
njewobram/20
njewobrost/8
njewobzawiź/21
njewobłakomił/16
njewujšł/1,17
njewukloknjen/1,18
njewupas/34
njewupomož/35
njewurkaj/1,7
njewurost/8
njewusromośil/1,4
njewuzamóžnjał/16
njewuśišć/21
njewóstśěs/34
njewótbłomjenjen/1,18
njewótejšł/1,17
njewótpjac/35
njewótrost/8
njewóttśěs/34
njewóźel/1,4
njewóžynaj/1,7
njezaintegrěrował/16
njezakurknjen/1,18
njezapas/34
njezapleś/35
njezarost/8
njezasmjerź/26
njezašum/20
njezejšł/1,17
njezeštukowal/1,4
njezjadnorjen/1,18
njezměnił/16
njeznjas/34
njezrost/8
njezwjeź/35
njezwónoź/21
njezwóstawaj/1,7
nješćěp/20
nunw/28
pariś/3
pasaś/3
pasć/3
pišćal/1,10
pjakl/1,10
pjerj/1,31
plasć/3
policajaŕc/1,2
popajź/15
profeś/1,10
póbłuźen/1,18
pócerjowal/1,4
póderb/20
pódob/28
pódrost/8
pódružb/28
pódzalěz/34
pójšł/1,17
pókalił/16
pómjatl/1,10
pórost/8
pótrjef/20
pótłuc/35
pótłuk/1,7
pótśěs/34
pówóź/14
pławnicc/1,2
pśedkup/5
pśedm/1,11
pśednjasen/1,18
pśedzgl/1,11
pśejm/22
pśepórucyl/1,4
pśetśěs/34
pśewiź/21
pśewlac/35
pśešlapował/16
pśimjet/8
pśipśišł/1,17
pśispomnjen/1,18
pśitrjef/20
pśiwrośaj/1,7
rob/28
rop/28
rozejšł/1,17
roześac/35
rozglěź/1,2
roznjas/34
rozsekal/1,4
sebjezachowan/1,18
sejź/25
skal/23
skoděrował/16
slědkkup/5
spinaś/3
spl/1,11
sponsorstwj/1,2
suseź/1,10
sław/28
taj/24
tl/1,11
transportnistwj/1,2
trjef/20
typaj/1,7
tšub/28
wij/24
wobejšł/1,17
wobkwiś/35
wobleśen/1,18
woblutosć/15
wobmam/20
wobmósćil/1,4
wobram/20
wobraź/14
wobwěsć/15
wobzawiź/21
wokśidl/1,10
wopasował/16
woplěwj/1,2
wopłaś/14
wukwiś/35
wumjertwjen/1,18
wupas/34
wupósćełaj/1,7
wurost/8
wusodłowal/1,4
wušćuwał/16
wójšł/1,17
wótejź/35
wótgrěšen/1,18
wóttśěs/34
wóznamil/1,4
wóśiskaj/1,7
wš/1,32
zajěź/35
zajšł/1,17
zakłaźen/1,18
zamawnuł/16
zarost/8
zarědowaŕc/1,2
zasmjerź/26
zawiź/25
zašum/20
zewlac/35
zezdal/1,4
zeškóźen/1,18
zgl/1,11
zgóź/15
zmaršć/15
znjas/34
zrěšył/16
zwónkaj/1,7
zwónoź/21
zwěsć/15
Łoboźin/1,30
śěl/1,10
Štelnin/1,30
škórcycc/1,2
šwikal/1,10
šćerb/28
šł/1,17
Žyź/1,10
žołw/5
žyl/1,10
